Vermont, session 2025-2026, S254.
It is hereby enacted by the General Assembly of the State of Vermont:
Sec. 1. 28 V.S.A. § 551a is amended to read:
§ 551. LAW ENFORCEMENT POWERS OF CORRECTIONAL
OFFICERS; TRAINING REQUIREMENTS
* * *
(c) Upon request of a correctional officer who is assigned to the Field
Supervision Unit, the Commissioner shall authorize the officer to train and
become certified by the Vermont Criminal Justice Training Council in the use
of firearms for defensive purposes, appropriate use of force, reporting and
VT LEG #385269 v.1

BILL AS INTRODUCED S.254
2026 Page 2 of 2
record keeping related to firearms, and personal liability for actions and
conduct related to firearms. The Commissioner and the Executive Director of
the Council shall develop the curriculum necessary to comply with this
subsection. A correctional officer who successfully completes the training
requirements of this subsection shall be permitted to carry a firearm while on
duty and to employ it in a defensive capacity.
Sec. 2. EFFECTIVE DATE
This act shall take effect on July 1, 2026.
VT LEG #385269 v.1